german.affix
SET ISO8859-1
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwäüößáéêàâñESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWÄÜÖ

# (c) copyright by Bjoern Jacke <bjoern@j3e.de>
# my be used under the terms of the GNU General Public Licence version 2
# This licence can be found at http://www.gnu.org/copyleft/gpl.html

# inseparable ge- prefix for verbs
PFX G N 1
PFX G   0     ge           .                                     # rufen > gerufen


# un- prefix for anything
PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un           .                                     # gesund > ungesund


# Inseparable ver- prefix for verbs
PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0     ver          .                                     # kaufen > verkaufen


# IN, INNEN for feminizing nouns and NEN for xxxIN nouns
SFX F N 7
SFX F   0     nen          in                                    # Bäuerin > Bäuerinnen
SFX F   e     in           e                                     # Bote > Botin
SFX F   e     innen        e
SFX F   0     in           [^i]n                                 # Spion > Spionin
SFX F   0     innen        [^i]n
SFX F   0     in           [^en]                                 # Freund > Freundin
SFX F   0     innen        [^en]


# The question is: How to switch Capitalization off?
# This will not serve us much otherwise!
# LICHxx for creating adverbs and adjectives
SFX L N 12
SFX L   0       tlich      n                                     # verschieden > verschiedentlich
SFX L   0       tliche     n
SFX L   0       tlicher    n
SFX L   0       tliches    n
SFX L   0       tlichem    n
SFX L   0       tlichen    n
SFX L   0       lich       [^n]                                  # bitter > bitterlich #nn
SFX L   0       liche      [^n]                                  #nn
SFX L   0       licher     [^n]                                  #nn
SFX L   0       liches     [^n]                                  #nn
SFX L   0       lichem     [^n]                                  #nn
SFX L   0       lichen     [^n]                                  #nn


#
# How to force Capitals on for heit/keit ?
#
# HEIT substantivation:
SFX H N 2
SFX H   0       heit       .                                     # gemein > Gemeinheit
SFX H   0       heiten     .                                     # fein > Feinheiten

# KEIT substantivation:
SFX K N 2
SFX K   0       keit       .                                     # heimlich > Heimlichkeit
SFX K   0       keiten     .                                     # eitel > Eitelkeiten


# CHEN diminuitiv:
SFX M N 2
SFX M   0       chen       .
SFX M   0       chens      .


# for adjectives:
#SFX A Y 46
SFX A Y 54
SFX A   0       r          e                                     # älteste > ältester
SFX A   0       n          e
SFX A   0       m          e
SFX A   0       s          e
SFX A   0       e          [^elrß]                                # formbar > formbare
SFX A   0       er         [^elrß]
SFX A   0       en         [^elrß]
SFX A   0       em         [^elrß]
SFX A   0       es         [^elrß]
SFX A   0       e          [^e][rl]                              # schnell > schnelle
SFX A   0       er         [^e][rl]                              # schal > schale
SFX A   0       en         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       em         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       es         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       e          [^u]er                                # schwer > schwere
SFX A   0       er         [^u]er
SFX A   0       en         [^u]er
SFX A   0       em         [^u]er
SFX A   0       es         [^u]er
SFX A   er      re         uer                                   # teuer > teure
SFX A   er      rer        uer                                   # sauer > saurer
SFX A   er      ren        uer
SFX A   er      rem        uer
SFX A   er      res        uer
SFX A   0       e          [eil]el                               # parallel > parallele
SFX A   0       er         [eil]el                               # viel > viele
SFX A   0       en         [eil]el                               # scheel > scheele
SFX A   0       em         [eil]el
SFX A   0       es         [eil]el
SFX A   el      le         [^eil]el                              # eitel > eitle #nnn
SFX A   el      ler        [^eil]el                              # simpel > simple #nnn
SFX A   el      len        [^eil]el                              #nnn
SFX A   el      lem        [^eil]el                              #nnn
SFX A   el      les        [^eil]el                              #nnn
SFX A   ß       sse        [ae]ß                                 # blaß > blasse
SFX A   ß       sser       [ae]ß
SFX A   ß       ssen       [ae]ß
SFX A   ß       ssem       [ae]ß
SFX A   ß       sses       [ae]ß
SFX A   0       e          [^iae]ß                               # gemäß > gemäße
SFX A   0       er         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       en         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       em         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       es         [^iae]ß
SFX A   0       e          eiß                                   # weiß >weiße
SFX A   0       er         eiß
SFX A   0       en         eiß
SFX A   0       em         eiß
SFX A   0       es         eiß
SFX A   ß       sse        [^e]iß                                # gewiss > gewisse
SFX A   ß       sser       [^e]iß
SFX A   ß       ssen       [^e]iß
SFX A   ß       ssem       [^e]iß
SFX A   ß       sses       [^e]iß
#SFX A   lig     elig       [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adelig
#SFX A   lig     elige      [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
#SFX A   lig     eliger     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
#SFX A   lig     eligen     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
#SFX A   lig     eligem     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
#SFX A   lig     eliges     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
#SFX A   erig    rig        [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrig
#SFX A   erig    rige       [^hi]erig
#SFX A   erig    riger      [^hi]erig
#SFX A   erig    rigen      [^hi]erig
#SFX A   erig    rigem      [^hi]erig
#SFX A   erig    riges      [^hi]erig


# for comparative forms of adjectives:
SFX C Y 125
SFX C   0       ere        [^elrß]                                # neu > neuere
SFX C   0       erer       [^elrß]
SFX C   0       eren       [^elrß]
SFX C   0       erem       [^elrß]
SFX C   0       eres       [^elrß]
SFX C   0       re         e                                     # prüde > prüdere
SFX C   0       rer        e
SFX C   0       ren        e
SFX C   0       rem        e
SFX C   0       res        e
SFX C   0       ere        [^e][lr]                              # schmal > schmale
SFX C   0       erer       [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       eren       [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       erem       [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       eres       [^e][lr]
SFX C   el      lere       el                                    # eitel > eitlere
SFX C   el      lerer      el
SFX C   el      leren      el
SFX C   el      lerem      el
SFX C   el      leres      el
SFX C   er      rere       uer                                   # teuer > teurere
SFX C   er      rerer      uer
SFX C   er      reren      uer
SFX C   er      rerem      uer
SFX C   er      reres      uer
SFX C   0       ere        [^u]er                                # schwer > schwerere
SFX C   0       erer       [^u]er
SFX C   0       eren       [^u]er
SFX C   0       erem       [^u]er
SFX C   0       eres       [^u]er
SFX C   ß       ssere      [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       sserer     [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       sseren     [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       sserem     [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       sseres     [ae]ß
SFX C   0       ere        [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       erer       [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       eren       [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       erem       [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       eres       [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       ere        eiß
SFX C   0       erer       eiß
SFX C   0       eren       eiß
SFX C   0       erem       eiß
SFX C   0       eres       eiß
SFX C   ß       ssere        [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       sserer       [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       sseren       [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       sserem       [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       sseres       [^e]iß
SFX C   lig     eligere    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adeligere
SFX C   lig     eligerer   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligeren   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligerem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligeres   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   erig    rigere     [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrigere
SFX C   erig    rigerer    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigeren    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigerem    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigeres    [^hi]erig
SFX C   0       este       [ksuxz]                              # neu > neueste
SFX C   0       ester      [ksuxz]
SFX C   0       esten      [ksuxz]                              # mies > miesesten
SFX C   0       estem      [ksuxz]                              # lax > laxestem
SFX C   0       estes      [ksuxz]                              # spitz > spitzestes
SFX C   0       este       ss
SFX C   0       ester      ss
SFX C   0       esten      ss
SFX C   0       estem      ss
SFX C   0       estes      ss
SFX C   0       ste        et                                    # geeignet > geeignetste
SFX C   0       ster       et
SFX C   0       sten       et
SFX C   0       stem       et
SFX C   0       stes       et
SFX C   0       este       [^e]t                                 # matt > matteste
SFX C   0       ester      [^e]t
SFX C   0       esten      [^e]t
SFX C   0       estem      [^e]t
SFX C   0       estes      [^e]t
SFX C   0       ste        [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerste
SFX C   0       ster       [^dkßstxz]                            # dick > dickster
SFX C   0       sten       [^dkßstxz]                            # lahm > lahmsten
SFX C   0       stem       [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerstem
SFX C   0       stes       [^dkßstxz]                            # teuer > teuerstes
SFX C   0       ste        nd                                    # wohlhabend > wohlhabendste
SFX C   0       ster       nd
SFX C   0       sten       nd
SFX C   0       stem       nd
SFX C   0       stes       nd
SFX C   0       este       [^n]d                                 # wild > wildeste
SFX C   0       ester      [^n]d
SFX C   0       esten      [^n]d
SFX C   0       estem      [^n]d
SFX C   0       estes      [^n]d
SFX C   ß       sseste     [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       ssester    [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       ssesten    [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       ssestem    [ae]ß
SFX C   ß       ssestes    [ae]ß
SFX C   0       este       [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       ester      [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       esten      [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       estem      [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       estes      [^aei]ß
SFX C   0       este       eiß
SFX C   0       ester      eiß
SFX C   0       esten      eiß
SFX C   0       estem      eiß
SFX C   0       estes      eiß
SFX C   ß       sseste     [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       ssester    [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       ssesten    [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       ssestem    [^e]iß
SFX C   ß       ssestes    [^e]iß
SFX C   lig     eligste    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adeligste
SFX C   lig     eligster   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligsten   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligstem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligstes   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   erig    rigste     [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrig
SFX C   erig    rigster    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigsten    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigstem    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigstes    [^hi]erig

# a few 'catch all' plural forms:
# All plurals seem to boil down to one of 'N', 'E', 'P' or 'Q'
# (or are 'irregular')


SFX E Y 1
SFX E   0       e          .                                     # Wind > Winde



SFX N Y 1
SFX N   0       n          .                                     # Lampe > Lampen


SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0       en         .                                     # Tat > Taten



SFX R Y 3
SFX R   0       er         [^e]                                  # Licht > Lichter
SFX R   0       ern        [^e]
SFX R   0       r          e                                     # Beamte > Beamter
